Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16B.2971] ACQUISITION OF PROPERTY PROHIBITED; FLOOD CONTROL AND WATER RETENTION. new text end new text begin (a) An agency or nonprofit organization may not acquire real property in fee or by easement for the purpose of a flood control or water retention project if the state owns land within the project area. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this section, a "flood control or water retention project" is a project with the primary purpose to hold water on the land or otherwise prevent flooding. new text end